Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. State Board of Optometry

§ 1707.
Qualifications; term of office; removal.

The State Board of Optometry is created.

The Board shall consist of five members, three of whom shall be residents of the State who have had at least five years’ experience in the practice of optometry in the State and are in the active practice of optometry at the time of their appointment; and two members who shall be representatives of the public, who shall be residents of the State for five years, and who shall have no financial interest in the profession other than as a consumer or potential consumer of its services.

Board members shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 46;

2019, No. 30

, § 12.

§ 1708.
Powers and duties.

The Board shall:

Adopt rules under the Vermont Administrative Procedure Act necessary for the performance of its duties, ensuring that at least the following are established by statute or rule:

a definition of the behavior for which a license is required;

explanations of appeal and other significant rights given by law to licensees, applicants, and the public; and

standards for acceptance of continuing education, which may identify mandatory content specific to pharmacology, and management of adverse drug reactions.

[Repealed.]

The Board shall not limit the:

ownership of optometric practices to licensed optometrists;

number of offices or sites at which an optometrist may practice; or

right of optometrists to practice in an association, partnership, corporation, or other lawful entity with anyone.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1983, No. 242

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2009, No. 35

, § 28;

2019, No. 30

, § 12.

§ 1709.
Functioning of Board of Optometry.

Annually, the Board shall meet to elect a chair, vice chair, and a secretary.

Meetings may be called by the Chair and shall be called upon the request of any other two members.

Meetings shall be warned and conducted in accordance with 1 V.S.A. chapter 5.

A majority of the members of a Board shall constitute a quorum for transacting business, and all action shall be taken upon a majority vote of the members present and voting.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 47;

2009, No. 35

, § 41.

§ 1710.
Repealed.
1983, No. 242 (Adj. Sess.), § 3.